Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.46.080

Duration of conservator's term—Rehabilitated banks—Management.

The conservator shall serve for such time as is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the conservatorship as intended by this chapter. If rehabilitated, the rehabilitated bank shall be returned to management or new managements under such conditions as are reasonable and necessary to prevent recurrence of the condition which occasioned the conservatorship.

[ 2014 c 37 s 251; 2013 c 76 s 20; 1975 1st ex.s. c 87 s 8. Formerly RCW 30.46.080.]